Tennessee, session 114, HB2443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 34-1-102, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Parents shall continue to be responsible for the support of each child for
whom they are responsible after the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age if the child
is enrolled in an accredited high school. The duty of support continues until the child
graduates from high school or the class of which the child is a member when the child
attains eighteen (18) years of age graduates, whichever occurs first, but in no event shall
support continue after the child reaches nineteen (19) years of age unless the child is
handicapped or disabled, as provided in § 36-5-101(k).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-5-101, is amended by deleting
subdivision (g)(6)(B)(i) and substituting:
(i) The department's records demonstrate that the child for whom an order of
support in a Title IV-D child support case has been entered has reached eighteen (18)
years of age and has graduated from high school, or that the class of which the child is a
member when the child reached eighteen (18) years of age has graduated from high
school, the obligor has otherwise provided the department with written documentation of
such facts, or the obligor has provided the department with written documentation that a
child for whom the obligor is required to pay support has died or has married; provided,
HB2443
012286
- 1 -

however, that in no event shall support continue after the child reaches nineteen (19)
years of age except as provided in subsection (k);
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012286